Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. In General

Cross references. —

As to victim bill of rights, see §

14-6-502

.

§ 1-40-101.
Short title.

This act [§§

1-40-101

through

1-40-119

] is known and may be cited as the “Crime Victims Compensation
Act”.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1.

Cited

in

Jones v. State, 2002 WY 35, 41 P.3d 1247,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 1-40-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

1-40-101

through

1-40-119

]:

“Account” means the crime victims’ compensation account established by W.S.

1-40-114

;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 81, § 3.

“Criminal act” means an act committed or attempted in this state, including an act of domestic violence, which constitutes a crime as defined by the laws of this state or an act of terrorism, as defined by 18 U.S.C. 2331 committed outside the United States, and which results in actual bodily injury, or actual mental harm, or death to the victim. No act involving the operation of a motor vehicle, boat or aircraft which results in injury or death constitutes a crime for the purpose of this act unless the injury or death was recklessly or intentionally inflicted through the use of the vehicle, boat or aircraft, or unless the act constitutes a violation of W.S.

31-5-233

;

“Dependent” means any relative of the victim who was wholly or partially dependent upon the victim’s income at the time of his injury or death and includes the child of the victim born after his death;

“Economic loss” means and includes medical and hospital expenses, loss of earnings, loss of future earnings resulting from the injury, funeral and burial expenses and loss of support to the dependents of the victim to include home maintenance and child care;

“Medical expense” includes the cost of all medical and dental services, mental health counseling and care, dental and prosthetic devices, eyeglasses or other corrective lenses, and services rendered in accordance with any method of healing recognized by the law of this state;

“Personal injury” means actual bodily injury or actual mental harm;

“Relative of the victim” means his spouse, parent, grandparent, stepparent, child including natural born child, stepchild or adopted child, grandchild, brother or sister;

“Victim” means:

A person who suffers personal injury or is killed in this state as a direct result of:

A criminal act of another person;

The person’s good faith and reasonable effort in attempting to prevent the commission of a criminal act, or to apprehend a person engaging in a criminal act or assisting a law enforcement officer to do so;

Assisting or attempting to assist a person against whom a crime is being perpetrated or attempted;

A federal crime occurring in Wyoming.

A resident who is a victim of a crime occurring outside this state if:

The crime would be compensable had it occurred inside this state; and

The crime occurred in a state which does not have a crime victim compensation program, for which the victim is eligible as eligibility is set forth in W.S.

1-40-101

through

1-40-119

.

A resident of this state who is injured or killed by an act of terrorism, as defined by 18 U.S.C. 2331, committed outside the United States;

Family members who are Wyoming residents and who have suffered a pecuniary loss as a result of a terrorist attack in the United States, regardless of the actual victim’s residency;

A resident of this state who is a victim of a crime involving terrorism occurring outside this state if:

The crime would be compensable had it occurred within this state; and

The resident of this state suffered a pecuniary loss as a direct result of the act of terrorism committed in another state of the United States.

“Division” means the victim services division within the office of the attorney general, created by W.S.

9-1-636

;

“Catastrophic injury” means any permanent disability of limbs or functions as a result of being a victim of a crime;

“Clandestine laboratory operation remediation” means a remediation of a clandestine laboratory operation carried out by a law enforcement agency acting as an emergency responder pursuant to W.S. 35-9-152(a)(i).

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1987, ch. 119, § 1; 1989, ch. 233, § 1; 1997, ch. 122, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, §§ 2, 3; 1999, ch. 135, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 71, § 1; 2008, ch. 78, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

inserted (a)(xii).

Laws 2008, ch. 78, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-40-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998,
ch. 81, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1, related to the Wyoming Crime Victims' Compensation Commission.

§ 1-40-104.
Division powers and duties.

The division shall:

Hear and determine all matters relating to claims for compensation;

Publish annually a report showing its fiscal transactions for the preceding year, the amount of its accumulated cash and securities and a balance sheet showing its financial condition by means of an actuarial evaluation of commission assets and liabilities;

Keep a true and accurate record of all its proceedings, which record is open to public inspection at all reasonable hours;

Promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purpose of this act pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Perform any other functions necessary to carry out the purpose of this act;

Hearings and final decisions on victim’s compensations awards conducted by the division shall be exempt from the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, including the provisions for judicial review under W.S.

16-3-114

and

16-3-115

.

In addition to any other powers specified by law, the division is empowered to:

Request access to any reports of investigations, medical records or other data necessary to assist the division in making a determination of eligibility for compensation under this act. Upon authorization of the attorney general, law enforcement officials, state agencies and local government units shall provide assistance or information requested by the division;

Publicize the availability of compensation and information regarding the filing of claims;

Investigate claims;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 81, § 3.

Subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, require the production of records and other evidence, administer oaths or affirmations, conduct hearings and receive relevant evidence;

Apply for and accept and administer monies from the federal government, its agencies and all other sources, public and private, for carrying out any of its functions;

Collect, develop, analyze and maintain statistical information, records and reports as the division determines relevant or necessary to carry out its powers and duties pursuant to this act;

After exhausting all alternatives available in paragraphs (i), (iii), (v) and (vi) of this subsection, direct and pay for medical examinations of victims as the division determines necessary to verify claims of economic loss due to injury;

Collect all monies authorized by this act to be collected by the division; and

Pay all compensation or other benefits that are determined to be due under this act and under division rules and regulations.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 81, § 3.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1987, ch. 119, § 1; 1993, ch. 43, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, §§ 2, 3.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 1-40-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998,
ch. 81, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1, related to the Victims' Compensation Commission receiving legal advice from the attorney general.

§ 1-40-106.
Eligibility
for compensation.

The victim or his dependent is entitled to compensation under this act [§§

1-40-101

through

1-40-119

] if:

The victim suffered personal injury as a result of a criminal act;

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 233, § 2.

The injury to or death of the victim was not attributable to his own wrongful act;

The appropriate law enforcement authorities were notified of the criminal act allegedly causing the injury to or death of the victim as soon as practical under the circumstance after perpetration of the offense and the claimant cooperates with appropriate law enforcement authorities with respect to the crime for which compensation is sought;

The application for compensation is filed with the division within one (1) year after the date of the injury to or death of the victim, or within any extension of time the division allows for good cause shown; and

The owner of real estate has paid all claims for reimbursement pursuant to W.S. 35-9-158(a)(ii).

No victim or dependent shall be denied compensation solely because:

He is a relative of the offender or was living with the offender as a family or household member at the time of the injury or death. However, the division may award compensation to a victim or dependent who is a relative, family or household member of the offender only if the division can reasonably determine the offender will receive no economic benefit or unjust enrichment from the compensation;

He is not a resident of the state.

Any person who perpetrates any criminal act on the person of another or who is convicted of a felony after applying to the division for compensation is not eligible or entitled to receive compensation under this act.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1989, ch. 233, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 2008, ch. 78, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

inserted (a)(vi) and made related stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 78, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

Applicability. —

In a drunk driving case, the sentencing court did not err when it ordered that restitution be paid to an injured passenger in addition to the amount paid to the crime victims compensation fund. Jones v. State, 2002 WY 35, 41 P.3d 1247,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 1-40-107.
Application for compensation; required information.

The application for compensation shall be on a form furnished by the division, setting forth:

The victim’s name and address;

If the victim is deceased, the claimant’s name and address and his relationship to the victim, the names and addresses of the victim’s dependents and the extent to which each is dependent;

The date and nature of the criminal act on which claim for compensation is based;

The date and place where and the law enforcement officials to whom notification of the criminal act was given;

The nature and extent of the injuries the victim sustained and the names and addresses of those giving medical and hospitalization treatment to the victim;

The economic loss to the applicant and to all other persons as specified under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section resulting from the injury or death;

The amount and source of benefits, payments or awards, if any, payable to the applicant and dependents;

Releases authorizing the surrender to the division of all reports, medical records and other information relating to the claim and crime; and

Any other information the division reasonably requires.

The division may require that materials substantiating the facts stated in the application be submitted with the application. If the division finds that an application does not contain the required information or that the facts stated therein have not been substantiated, it shall notify the applicant in writing of the specific additional items or information or materials required and that the applicant has thirty (30) days from the date of the notice in which to furnish those items to the division. The division shall reject the application of an applicant who although notified fails to file the requested information or substantiating materials within the time specified unless he requests, and the division grants, an extension of time in which to furnish that information.

An applicant may file an amended application or additional substantiating materials to correct inadvertent errors or omissions at any time before the division disposes of the original application. In either case, the filing of additional information or of an amended application shall be considered to have been filed at the same time as the original application.

Information contained in the claim files and records of victims, which are subject to any privilege of confidentiality under Wyoming law, shall remain confidential and shall not be open to public inspection. The information shall be immune from legal process and shall not, without the consent of the person furnishing the information, be admitted as evidence or used for any purpose in any action, suit or other judicial, legislative or administrative proceeding.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 1999, ch. 135, § 1.

§ 1-40-108.
Hearing; findings; order.

Hearings shall be held on the application and are open to the public unless the division determines that a closed hearing is necessary because:

The alleged assailant or offender has not been brought to trial and a public hearing would adversely affect either his apprehension or his trial;

The victim or alleged assailant is a minor;

An open hearing would cause trauma for the victim;

A public hearing would frustrate rather than further the interest of justice.

A record shall be kept of the proceedings of hearings held before the division and shall include the division’s findings of fact and conclusions of the amount of compensation, if any, to which the applicant and persons dependent on a deceased victim are entitled. No part of the record of any hearing before the division may be used for any purpose in a criminal proceeding except in the prosecution of a person alleged to have perjured himself in his testimony before the division.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the division shall enter an order stating:

Its findings of fact;

Its decision as to whether or not compensation is due under this act [§§

1-40-101

through

1-40-119

] and the amount of compensation due, if any;

Whether disbursement of the compensation awarded is to be made in a lump sum or in periodic payments; and

The person or persons to whom the compensation should be paid.

If the division finds, in the case of an application made by a person dependent for his support on a deceased victim, that persons other than the applicant were also dependent on that victim for their support, it shall also:

Name those persons in its order;

State the percentage share of the total compensation award and the dollar amount to which each is entitled; and

Order that those amounts be paid to those persons directly or, in the case of a minor or incompetent, to his guardian or conservator, as the case may be.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the division may promulgate rules providing for an expedited claims process for applications in which eligibility is clear and all information has been verified.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1989, ch. 233, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Restitutional sentencing under Victim and Witness Protection Act
§ 5 (18 USC §§ 3579 , 3580 [now see
18 USC §§ 3663 , 3664]),
79 ALR Fed 724.

§ 1-40-109.
Standards for compensation.

For the purpose of determining the amount of compensation payable pursuant to this act, the division, insofar as practicable, shall formulate standards for uniform application of this act and shall take into consideration rates and amounts of compensation payable for injuries and death under other laws of this state and of the United States and the availability of funds under this act.

Loss of earnings and loss of future earnings shall be determined on the basis of the victim’s average monthly earnings for the six (6) months immediately preceding the date of the injury, or the current federal minimum wage, whichever is less.

Loss of support shall be determined on the basis of the victim’s or defendant’s average monthly earnings for the six (6) months immediately preceding the date of the injury, or the current federal minimum wage, whichever is less.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the maximum individual award of compensation paid to any victim or dependent shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00). Compensation shall only be awarded for economic losses occurring within a twenty-four (24) month period from the date of the injury or discovery of the crime. However, the division may extend the twenty-four (24) month period to allow compensation for mental health counseling and care occurring within an additional twelve (12) month period for a total of thirty-six (36) months.

In addition to the maximum award authorized in subsection (d) of this section, in the case of catastrophic injury the division may award an additional amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) to the victim to cover future lost wages, special medical needs and any other special assistance needed as a result of the injury. The additional award may be made only for economic losses occurring within twenty-four (24) months after the date of the injury or discovery of the crime.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 1999, ch. 135, § 1; 2019 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d) added “Compensation shall only be awarded for economic losses occurring within a twenty-four (24) month period from the date of the injury or discovery of the crime. However, the division may extend the twenty-four (24) month period to allow compensation for mental health counseling and care occurring within an additional twelve (12) month period for a total of thirty-six (36) months”; and in (e), substituted “economic losses” for “losses and expenses” and added “or discovery of the crime” to the last sentence.

§ 1-40-110.
Compensation award.

If a person is injured or killed by a criminal act, the division may order the payment of compensation in accordance with this act for:

Expenses actually and reasonably incurred as a result of the personal injury or death of the victim, by the victim, his dependent, or any person responsible for the victim’s maintenance;

Loss of earning power as a result of the victim’s total or partial incapacity;

Economic loss to the deceased victim’s dependents; and

Any other loss resulting from the personal injury or death of the victim which the division determines to be reasonable.

In determining whether to award compensation under this act, the division shall consider:

All circumstances surrounding the victim’s conduct determined to be relevant which directly contributed to the victim’s injury or death;

Need for financial aid; and

Any other relevant matters.

The division shall not consider whether the alleged assailant has been apprehended, prosecuted or convicted, nor the result of any criminal proceedings against him.

The crime victims compensation account is not a state health program and is not intended to be used as a primary payor to other health care assistance programs, but is a public, quasi-charitable fund whose fundamental purpose is to assist victims of violent crimes through a period of financial hardship as a payor of last resort. Payment made in accordance with this section shall be considered payment of last resort that follows all other sources and is provided subsequent to all other benefits. Accordingly, in determining the amount of compensation to be allowed by order, the division shall consider amounts received or receivable from any other source or sources by the victim or his dependents as a result of the incident or offense giving rise to the application. The division shall not deny compensation solely because the applicant is entitled to income from a collateral source.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 1999, ch. 135, § 1.

§ 1-40-111.
Emergency awards; limitation.

The division may grant an emergency award prior to the holding of a hearing, if upon application of a person eligible for compensation, the division determines undue hardship will result to the applicant if immediate payment is not made.

The amount of the emergency award shall be dependent on the applicant’s immediate and verifiable needs as a result of loss of income or support, for emergency medical treatment, or for funeral and burial expenses. The amount of an emergency award to an applicant shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

Any emergency award granted under this section shall be deducted from the final compensation award made to the applicant. The excess of the amount of any emergency award over the amount of the final award, or the full amount of the emergency award if no final award is made shall be repaid to the division by the applicant.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2.

§ 1-40-112.
Recovery from offender; restitution.

If an order for the payment of compensation for personal injury or death is made under this act [§§

1-40-101

through

1-40-119

], the state, upon payment of the amount of the order, shall be subrogated to any right of action the victim or dependent of the victim has against the person or persons responsible for the injury or death, and the state may bring an action against the responsible person for the amount of the damages the applicant sustained.

The applicant or other recipient shall give written notice to the division of the making of a claim or demand or the filing of a suit for the damages specified in subsection (a) of this section.

Restitution by an offender under W.S.

7-9-101

through

7-9-115

shall:

To the extent compensation is paid under this act, be paid to the division, deposited in the account and be set off against a judgment in favor of the state in a civil action arising out of the same facts or event;

Reduce by like amount any compensation subsequently paid under this act arising out of the same facts or event.

through (f) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 152, § 2.

Any payment of benefits to, or on behalf of, a victim or other claimant under this act creates a debt due and owing to the state by any person found, in a criminal court proceeding in which he is a party, to have committed the criminal act. Payment of the debt shall be a condition of probation or parole:

In making payment of the debt a condition of probation or parole, the court or state board of parole shall set the schedule or amounts of payments, subject to modification based on change of circumstances;

If the court or board does not order payment of the debt, or orders only partial payment, it shall state on the record the reasons therefor.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1987, ch. 119, § 1; ch. 157, § 2; 1997, ch. 152, § 2; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 2013 ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “7-9-115” for “7-9-112” in (c).

Cross references. —

As to probation and parole generally, see §

7-13-401

et seq.

As to disposition of earnings paid to prisoners, see §§

7-16-205

and

7-16-308

.

As to record and disbursement of wages, see §

7-18-114

.

Quoted

in

Jones v. State, 2002 WY 35, 41 P.3d 1247,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2002).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of “Son of Sam” laws regulating or prohibiting distribution of crime-related book, film or comparable revenues to criminals, 60 ALR4th 1210.

§ 1-40-113.
Waivers and releases void; exemption from creditors' claims.

Any agreement by an individual
to waive, release or commute his rights under this act [§§

1-40-101

through

1-40-119

] is void. Compensation due under this act may not be
assigned, pledged, encumbered, released or commuted. Compensation
under this act is exempt from all claims of creditors and from levy,
execution and attachment or other remedy for recovery or collection
of a debt, except that compensation for an allowable expense is not
exempt from a claim of a creditor to the extent that creditor provided
products, services or accommodations, the costs of which are included
in the compensation award.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1.

§ 1-40-114.
Crime
victims' compensation account.

There is established an account to be known as the crime victims’ compensation account. The account is under the administration and control of the division for purposes of providing compensation or other benefits to crime victims and for purposes of implementing this act. The account shall consist of all monies the division receives or collects from any source and all monies shall be paid to the state treasurer for deposit in the account. The division may accept, and shall deposit to the account, any gifts, contributions, donations, grants or federal funds specifically given to the division for the benefit of victims of crime.

The monies within the account may be withdrawn therefrom by vouchers signed by the director of the division or his designee. The division shall keep detailed permanent records of all monies credited to the account and all expenditures and disbursements from the account.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1987, ch. 119, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted the phrase “within the earmarked revenue fund” in the first sentence in (a).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to disbursal of unclaimed funds, see §

1-40-308

.

Cited

in

Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990).

§ 1-40-115.
Informing victims of program and application procedure.

Each law enforcement
and prosecuting agency, and any victim witness program or family violence
advocate funded in whole or in part with state or federal funds, shall
exercise reasonable care to insure that victims of crimes are informed
of the existence of the state program of compensation for death or
injuries sustained by victims of crime and the procedure for applying
for compensation under this act.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1999, ch. 135, § 1.

§ 1-40-116.
Fees not chargeable.

No fee shall be charged
to the applicant in any proceeding under this act except as provided
by this act. If the applicant is represented by counsel in making
application under this act or in any further proceedings provided
for in this chapter, the counsel shall not receive payment for his
services except an amount as the division determines to be reasonable.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2.

§ 1-40-117.
Falsifying, destroying or concealment of division records; furnishing
false information or failing to disclose; other violations.

Any agent or employee of the division who knowingly makes a false entry or falsely alters any division record, or who intentionally destroys, mutilates, conceals, removes or otherwise impairs the verity or availability of any division record with the knowledge of a lack of authority to do so, or who possesses a division record and refuses to deliver up that record upon proper request of a person lawfully entitled to receive it is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any violation of this chapter for which a penalty is not otherwise provided is a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to penalties for misdemeanors, see §

6-10-103

.

§ 1-40-118.
Distribution
of monies to crime victim service and victim assistance providers.

In addition to any other powers specified in this act the division shall oversee the distribution of federal and state funds under its control, to eligible crime victim service providers, including funds received under the federal Victims of Crime Act of 1984.

For purposes of this section “crime victim service provider” means any program operated by a public agency or nonprofit organization or any combination thereof which provides comprehensive services to victims of crime, including but not limited to:

Crisis intervention services;

Informing victims and witnesses of the case status and progress;

Assistance in participating in criminal justice proceedings;

Performing advocate duties for crime victims;

Assisting victims in recovering property damaged or stolen and in obtaining restitution or compensation for medical and other expenses incurred as a result of crime;

Developing community resources to assist victims of crime;

Assisting victims of crime in the preparation and presentation of claims under the Crime Victims Compensation Act.

In establishing priorities the division shall follow requirements regarding prioritization that are established by the funding authority.

The division shall by rule establish a method for distributing monies to crime victim service providers. The division’s rules and regulations shall reflect the following factors in determining the distribution formula: population, needs assessment, regional cost differences and any requirements promulgated by the granting source.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 81, § 3.

In determining whether a victim service provider is eligible to receive grants under subsection (d) of this section, the primary consideration shall be whether the eligibility requirements of the granting source are met, including the provider’s agreement to submit an annual unduplicated count of the number of victims it served in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the division.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 81, § 3.

Funds distributed under this section shall supplement, not supplant, existing victim or witness programs throughout the state.

To the extent the legislature provides funding for victim assistance providers that serve victims of all crimes, the division of victim services shall:

Distribute the state funding provided for victim assistance providers as follows:

No less than two percent (2%) of the total amount of state funding shall be distributed to each county and the Wind River Indian Reservation for victim assistance providers within the county or within the Wind River Indian Reservation that meet the requirements established by the division of victim services;

Of the remaining state funding under this subsection, amounts shall be distributed to the victim assistance providers within the counties and the Wind River Indian Reservation on a proportional basis according to each county’s and the reservation’s population. For purposes of the distribution under this subparagraph, the population residing on the Wind River Indian Reservation shall be determined separate from the balance of the population of Fremont county;

If funds have been returned to the division pursuant to unfulfilled contracts under this subsection at the end of the fiscal year, prior to reversion pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207(a), a law enforcement agency that has carried out a clandestine laboratory operation remediation may apply for compensation under this subsection for any remediation expenses not otherwise collected pursuant to W.S. 35-9-158(a). The maximum amount payable pursuant to this subsection to a law enforcement agency that has carried out a clandestine laboratory operation remediation shall be the amount set forth in the court approved expense report as provided under W.S. 35-9-158(a) minus amounts collected from other sources pursuant to W.S. 35-9-158(a).

Require victim assistance providers to:

Provide the services specified under subsection (a) of this section;

Advocate to ensure victims are allowed to exercise their rights under the victims bill of rights established in W.S.

1-40-203

;

Submit their long-term strategic plans to the division of victim services for approval.

Establish minimum program standards and uniform reporting procedures for victim assistance providers that receive state funding under this subsection through rules and regulations adopted in accordance with W.S. 9-1-638(a)(vii).

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 213, § 1; 1989, ch. 233, § 1; 1991, ch. 159, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 203, § 1; 2008, ch. 78, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1; ch. 194, § 1; 2012, ch. 31, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

added (g).

Laws 2005, ch. 203, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005, except for paragraph (g)(iii), which becomes effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

The 2008 amendment,

inserted (g)(i)(C).

Laws 2008, ch. 78, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2008.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment by ch. 170, §
1, effective July 1, 2009, deleted “as established in the most recent federal decennial census” following “reservation's population” in the first sentence of (g)(i)(B).

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 194, §
1, added “including the provider's agreement to submit an annual unduplicated count of the number of victims served in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the division” in (e).

Laws 2009, ch. 194, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 12, 2009.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

added “it” after “number of victims” in (e).

Laws 2012, ch. 31, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

Victims of Crime Act of 1984. —

The federal Victims of Crime Act of 1984, referred to in subsection (a), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 10601 et seq.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch 170, § 3 provides: “(a) No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b) No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 203, § 2, appropriates $500,000 from the general fund to the victim services division within the office of the attorney general for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, to implement the purposes of the act. Of this general fund appropriation, funds are not to be distributed to crime victim service providers in the district attorneys' offices in the first and seventh judicial districts although nothing in the act is meant to prohibit the district attorneys for those judicial districts from seeking funding for crime victim services through the state budget process or other appropriate means.